Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 3. Organization of New Counties

Cross references. —

As to effect of county division in connection with payment of bonds, see §

18-4-310

.

As to effect of county division on payment and redemption of county funding bonds, see §

18-4-505

.

For constitutional provision relative to organization of new counties, see art. 12, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to changing county seats, see art. 12, § 3, Wyo. Const.

As to selection of jurors in new counties, see §

1-11-128

.

As to notaries public receiving new commission upon application to governor on formation of new counties, see §

32-1-101

.

§ 18-1-301.
Organization of new counties.

New counties may be organized as provided by W.S.

18-1-302

through

18-1-320

.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 59, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1002; C.S. 1910, § 1049; C.S. 1920, § 1279; R.S. 1931, § 29-201; C.S. 1945, § 26-201; W.S. 1957, § 18-27; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Population requirement. —

Big Horn county not being organized before adoption of the constitution, it was necessary to meet the statutory requirement as to population before organizing. Board of Comm'rs v. Perkins, 5 Wyo. 166, 38 P. 915,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1895).

Commissioners' powers and duties. —

Commissioners and their clerks appointed to organize a county, and perform all the duties preparatory to, respecting, or incident to election of the first county officers, though public officers, and required to take the oaths of commissioners and clerk, do not hold such offices, and are not entitled to the compensation provided for county officers but have authority to purchase election supplies at the expense of the county. Taylor v. Board of Comm'rs, 11 Wyo. 106, 70 P. 835,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1902).

Constitutional. —

This article is in the nature of an enabling act and, though inappropriate as to the organization of a new county for failing to provide, as required by art. 12, § 2, Wyo. Const., for the submission of the question to the electors, is not repugnant to the constitution, but is constitutional as far as it goes. Board of Comm'rs v. Woods, 18 Wyo. 316, 106 P. 923,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 316, 107 P. 753,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1910).

Application of general laws before organization. —

The provision of Laws 1911 creating the county of Platte (§

18-1-101

) and similar acts creating other new counties, to the effect that until the new county shall have selected officers as provided by law, and the same shall have duly qualified as such, all such portions of said county, as at the time of the passage of the act constituted a part of another county for judicial, revenue and elective purposes, shall be attached to said parent county, except as otherwise in the act provided, did not prevent the operation of the general law for organizing new counties as to the duties imposed thereby upon the organization commissioners and their clerk, with reference to conducting the next general election after the appointment of said commissioners. The effect of said provision in the act creating the new county was merely to continue the new county as a part of the original county or counties until its organization for election purposes, as to such elections only conducted by the old county that would necessarily be participated in by the electors within the territory of the new county if no provision had been made for the creation of such new county, and, hence, the provisions of the general law for the organization of new counties applies to any election pertaining to the pending or proposed organization of the new county, occurring after the appointment of the commissioners to organize the same. Dillman v. State, 20 Wyo. 404, 125 P. 367,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1912).

Commissioners to act until county organized. —

The powers and duties imposed upon commissioners appointed to organize an unorganized county, with reference to the holding of elections in such county, by the general law for organizing new counties, do not cease until the county is organized, where a special election has been held in the territory proposed to be cut off on the question of division and the vote has been in favor of division. Dillman v. State, 20 Wyo. 404, 125 P. 367,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1912).

Valid legislative power. —

Sections

18-1-301

to

18-1-303

are a valid exercise of legislative power to provide by general law for the organization of new counties, under art. 12, § 2, Wyo. Const.Budge v. Board of Comm'rs, 29 Wyo. 35, 208 P. 874,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1922).

Legislative, administrative functions. —

The formation of a county is a legislative function, and may be done by special act; but the organization of a county is an administrative function effected with the consent of the people of the formed county by administrative or executive officers acting under a general law. State ex rel. Budge v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 287, 219 P. 735,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1923).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 28 to 49.

20 C.J.S. Counties § 5.

§ 18-1-302.
Petition for organization.

Whenever at least three hundred (300) qualified electors who are property owners desire to organize a new county for the purpose of establishing a county government, they may petition the governor to appoint three (3) electors residing within the boundaries of the proposed new county to act as commissioners in organizing the new county. Attached to the petition shall be affidavits of at least two (2) qualified electors residing within the boundaries of the proposed new county stating that the petitioners are qualified electors and property owners residing within the boundaries of the proposed new county and that the requirements of W.S. 18-1-303(a) and (b) have been met.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 59, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 1003; C.S. 1910, § 1050; C.S. 1920, § 1280; R.S. 1931, § 29-202; C.S. 1945, § 26-202; W.S. 1957, § 18-28; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Specific counties. —

When Campbell county was carved out of Crook and Weston counties it was provided that, until it should have organized and elected county officers, all portions of Campbell county should belong to and be a part of Crook and Weston counties for revenue and other purposes, that portion of Campbell county lying within Crook county must, until the board of supervisors was duly elected and qualified, be considered as a part of Crook county in determining the status of that county, according to the assessed valuation of the property therein. Board of Comm'rs v. Mulholland, 22 Wyo. 130, 136 P. 112,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1913).

Curative statute. —

Curative statute legalizing defective organization of Teton county was not invalid as special act organizing county or regulating its affairs or interfering with uniform operation of general laws. State ex rel. Budge v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 287, 219 P. 735,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1923).

Cited

in

Taylor v. Board of Comm'rs, 11 Wyo. 106, 70 P. 835,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1902); Dillman v. State ex rel. Merrill, 20 Wyo. 404, 125 P. 367,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(1912); Budge v. Board of Comm'rs, 29 Wyo. 35, 208 P. 874,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1922).

§ 18-1-303.
Assessed valuation and population requirements of proposed and residual counties.

No new county shall be organized unless it:

Contains a population of at least three thousand (3,000) persons; and

Contains taxable property of at least seven million dollars ($7,000,000.00) as shown in the last assessment.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section the county or counties from which the proposed new county is to be formed shall each contain, after the new county is organized:

A population of at least five thousand (5,000) persons; and

Taxable property of at least nine million dollars ($9,000,000.00) as shown in the last assessment.

The governor may require further evidence of population and assessed value of the proposed new county and the county or counties from which the proposed new county is to be formed.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 59, § 3; 1895, ch. 81, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1004; C.S. 1910, § 1051; Laws 1917, ch. 58, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1281; Laws 1929, ch. 69, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 29-203; C.S. 1945, § 26-203; W.S. 1957, § 18-29; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Curative statute. —

Organization of Teton county without regard to provisions of this section as to population and assessed valuation of property, having been validated by curative act and recognized by other enactments, was not invalid. State ex rel. Budge v. Snyder, 31 Wyo. 333, 225 P. 1102,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1924).

§ 18-1-304.
Appointment of commissioners.

After the governor has received the petition specified in W.S.

18-1-302

and is satisfied the requirements provided for in W.S.

18-1-303

have been met he shall appoint the persons named in the petition as commissioners to organize the county and shall notify them of their appointment. If any of the commissioners die, resign or refuse to act the governor may appoint another.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 59, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 1005; C.S. 1910, § 1052; Laws 1917, ch. 58, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 1282; Laws 1929, ch. 69, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 29-204; C.S. 1945, § 26-204; W.S. 1957, § 18-30; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-1-305.
Meeting of commissioners; oath.

The commissioners shall as soon as practicable after receiving notice of their appointment meet at a suitable place within the proposed new county and each commissioner shall take and subscribe before any officer authorized to administer oaths an oath that he will faithfully and impartially discharge the duties of his office as prescribed by law and also the oath required of county commissioners.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 59, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 1006; C.S. 1910, § 1053; C.S. 1920, § 1283; R.S. 1931, § 29-205; C.S. 1945, § 26-205; W.S. 1957, § 18-31; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to oath of office generally, see art. 6, § 20, Wyo. Const.

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

§ 18-1-306.
Commissioners to appoint clerk; oath of clerk; calling election.

The appointed commissioners shall:

Appoint a clerk who shall take an oath that he will faithfully and impartially discharge the duties of his office as prescribed by law and shall also take the oath required of a county clerk;

Designate a place for the transaction of their official duties;

Call for an election for the purpose of having the qualified electors of the proposed new county decide:

If the proposed new county should be organized; and

The location of the county seat of the proposed new county.

The election may be held on an election date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

or another date specified by the appointed commissioners.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 59, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 1007; Laws 1909, ch. 75, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1054; C.S. 1920, § 1284; R.S. 1931, § 29-206; C.S. 1945, § 26-206; W.S. 1957, § 18-32; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to elections generally, see title 22.

Duties of commissioners. —

It is the duty of the commissioners appointed to organize a county and their clerk to perform all the duties imposed by law upon county commissioners and county clerks, respectively, preparatory to, respecting, or incident to the next general election occurring after the appointment of said commissioners, where a special election has been called and held prior to said general election for the purpose of submitting to the qualified electors of the proposed new county the question of division, and the vote has been in favor of division. Dillman v. State, 20 Wyo. 404, 125 P. 367,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1912).

§ 18-1-307.
Expenses of special election borne by new county; salary of clerk and commissioners.

The expenses for the special election provided by W.S. 18-1-306(a)(iii) shall be borne by the proposed new county and the county commissioners of the county or counties from which the new county is to be formed may impose a special levy upon the taxable property within the boundaries of the proposed new county to pay for the expenses of the election and to pay the salaries of the appointed commissioners and clerk. The appointed commissioners and clerk in the proposed new county shall each receive a salary of fifty dollars ($50.00).

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 75, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 1055; C.S. 1920, § 1285; R.S. 1931, § 29-207; C.S. 1945, § 26-207; W.S. 1957, § 18-33; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-1-308.
Election of officers.

If a majority of the qualified electors residing in the proposed new county vote for the organization, the new county is organized. At the next general election, or if the special election is held in conjunction with a general election, the qualified electors residing in the proposed new county shall vote for county and precinct officers as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 59, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 1008; Laws 1909, ch. 75, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 1056; C.S. 1920, § 1286; R.S. 1931, § 29-208; C.S. 1945, § 26-208; W.S. 1957, § 18-34; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Completion of organization. —

A county will not be fully organized until its officers, at least its county commissioners, are elected. Dillman v. State, 20 Wyo. 404, 125 P. 367,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1912).

§ 18-1-309.
Duties of commissioners and clerk.

The appointed commissioners and clerk shall perform the duties incident to such election as are imposed by law upon county commissioners and county clerks in organized counties except that the returns shall be canvassed and the result declared by the appointed commissioners.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 59, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 1009; C.S. 1910, § 1057; C.S. 1920, § 1287; R.S. 1931, § 29-209; C.S. 1945, § 26-209; W.S. 1957, § 18-35; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

For general powers of board of county commissioners, see §

18-3-504

.

For general duties of county clerks, see §

18-3-402

.

As to elections generally and as to duties of officers with reference thereto, see title 22.

§ 18-1-310.
When officers to qualify; when county organized.

On the first Monday of January following the election or as soon thereafter as possible, the county and precinct officers elected in the new county shall qualify and enter upon their respective duties. When at least two (2) county commissioners elected have qualified and entered upon their duties the county is organized and is vested with all the powers of an organized county.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 59, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 1010; C.S. 1910, § 1058; C.S. 1920, § 1288; R.S. 1931, § 29-210; C.S. 1945, § 26-210; W.S. 1957, § 18-36; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-1-311.
Approval of bonds of commissioners.

The commissioners appointed by the governor shall approve the bonds of the first county commissioners elected.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 59, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 1011; C.S. 1920, § 1289; R.S. 1931, § 29-211; C.S. 1945, § 26-211; W.S. 1957, § 18-37; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 11, ch. 59, Laws 1895, reads: “Sections two and three of an act, entitled, ‘An act to provide for the creation of Big Horn county, in Wyoming Territory, and to amend and re-enact sections forty-eight (48) and forty-nine (49) of chapter ninety (90), of the Session Laws of Wyoming Territory, of eighteen hundred and eighty-eight (1888) and for other purposes,’ approved March 12, 1890; and sections forty-seven (47) to and including section fifty-eight (58), of an act entitled ‘An act making divers appropriations and for other purpose,’ passed by the tenth legislative assembly of the Territory of Wyoming, notwithstanding the objections of the governor, are hereby repealed.” Approved February 16, 1895.

§ 18-1-312.
Payment of expenses in organization of new county.

Expenses incurred in the organization of the new county and expenses incurred on behalf of the new county before the elected county commissioners assume office shall be audited and paid by the board of commissioners of the new county in the same manner as expenses incurred after organization.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 39, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1291; R.S. 1931, § 29-213; C.S. 1945, § 26-213; W.S. 1957, § 18-39; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-1-313.
Assessment of property in new counties.

If a new county is organized after the first Monday in January and before the following fourth Monday in May, the deputy county assessors appointed in the original county or counties for districts included in the new county shall be ex officio deputy assessors for the new county and, with the county assessor of the new county, shall assess and return the value of the taxable property to the new county. The department of revenue shall assess all property within the new county authorized by law to be assessed by the department, and shall return and certify the same to the new county.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 81, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1292; R.S. 1931, § 29-214; C.S. 1945, § 26-214; W.S. 1957, § 18-40; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1991, ch. 174, § 2.

§ 18-1-314.
Taxes for new counties.

If a new county is organized after the fourth Monday in May and before the following first Monday in January the taxes levied and collected from property within the new county for that year shall be paid by the county treasurer of the original county to the county treasurer of the new county.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 81, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 1293; R.S. 1931, § 29-215; C.S. 1945, § 26-215; W.S. 1957, § 18-41; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-1-315.
Indebtedness to be apportioned upon division of county.

Any newly organized county is liable for the payment of an equitable proportion of the indebtedness existing at the time of organization of any counties from which the newly organized county is formed.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 54, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 678; R.S. 1899, § 1013; C.S. 1910, § 1061; C.S. 1920, § 1294; R.S. 1931, § 29-601; C.S. 1945, § 26-216; W.S. 1957, § 18-42; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

In general. —

Taxes due from the parent county to the state are debts; assets include delinquent taxes levied for state purposes. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

Adoption of constitution. —

Adoption of constitution did not by implication repeal this and other sections in this article. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

Claims against original county. —

Claims which existed as valid debts of the original county on the date of the organization of the new county, although not reduced to judgment until after that date, were properly included as part of the indebtedness of the original county for apportionment. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 25 Wyo. 172, 166 P. 674,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1917).

Delayed court order. —

In view of provision requiring commissioners of original county to state in their report the date when outstanding indebtedness became due, and that court upon finding amount to be charged the new county shall order its commissioners to issue warrants payable to the original county at a time not later than the time when the indebtedness shall become due, the action of the court in ordering a warrant payable to the new county at a time later than that when such indebtedness would become due is not prejudicial to the new county. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 25 Wyo. 172, 166 P. 674,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1917).

Delinquent taxes. —

In apportioning debts and assets between a parent county and one formed out of it, delinquent taxes should be computed as assets at their value only, and not at the aggregate amount on the rolls. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

Where a new county is formed out of parts of other counties, delinquent general taxes due from persons and property therein continue enforceable by the parent county; hence, in apportioning the debts and assets between the old and the new counties, such taxes are to be treated as assets. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

Determination of amount. —

The report of the commissioners of the parent county as to assets and debts is not conclusive, but the court may determine their amount. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

Judgments. —

Judgments against the parent county must be considered as debts in making apportionment. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

Jurisdiction of courts. —

The jurisdiction of courts in apportionment proceedings being derived from the provisions of this article only, they have no power to determine the validity of the indebtedness to be apportioned. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

New county, commissioners' duties. —

The provisions of this article do not require the commissioners of a new county to issue warrants against any particular taxes, or against the tax of any particular year. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

Value of taxes due. —

Where court found value of taxes due to original county to be much in excess of that reported by the old county and estimated by witnesses, the finding will not be disturbed because the witnesses improperly based their estimated value upon the probable cost of collection. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 25 Wyo. 172, 166 P. 674,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1917).

§ 18-1-316.
Method of ascertaining indebtedness; rule of apportionment.

When any new county is organized the county commissioners of the counties from which the new county is formed shall:

Determine the amount of county indebtedness existing at the time of the division;

Determine the total assessed value of the property of both the original and newly organized counties.

The proportion of indebtedness for which the new county is liable shall be determined by dividing the assessed value of the new county by the assessed value of the original county before the division. The assessed value figures will be taken from the assessment made before the division.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 32, § 1; 1886, ch. 36, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 679; Laws 1888, ch. 7, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1014; C.S. 1910, § 1062; C.S. 1920, § 1295; R.S. 1931, § 29-602; C.S. 1945, § 26-217; W.S. 1957, § 18-43; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-1-317.
Commissioners to report indebtedness to district court.

The county commissioners shall immediately report to the district court within which the new county is located:

The amount, type, interest rate and date payable of the indebtedness of each county from which the new county is formed;

The assessed value of the property of both the new and original counties;

The kind, value and location of all public property of the original county;

All monies and credits of the original county.

The report shall be verified by the affidavit of the chairman of the respective boards of county commissioners, and shall be accompanied with proof of the organization and description of the new county’s boundaries.

If the new county has no district court, the report specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be filed in a district court adjoining the new county.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 32, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 680; R.S. 1899, § 1015; C.S. 1910, § 1063; C.S. 1920, § 1296; R.S. 1931, § 29-603; C.S. 1945, § 26-218; W.S. 1957, § 18-44; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Construction. —

“Immediately” as used in this section means “as soon as practicable.” Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 25 Wyo. 172, 166 P. 674,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1917).

§ 18-1-318.
Notice of hearing on report.

The court to which the report is made shall immediately notify the chairman of the board of county commissioners of the new county of the time and place when the report will be heard and considered by the court.

All counties interested in the report shall have an opportunity to be heard and the hearing may be adjourned from time to time at the discretion of the court.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 32, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 681; R.S. 1899, § 1016; C.S. 1910, § 1064; C.S. 1920, § 1297; R.S. 1931, § 29-604; C.S. 1945, § 26-219; W.S. 1957, § 18-45; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-1-319.
Apportionment by court; order for payment by new county; lien upon property of new county.

The court to which the report is made shall determine the proportion of the existing indebtedness which the new county shall bear under the provisions of W.S.

18-1-316

after deducting the new county’s proportionate share of the value of the public property, money and credits of the original county. The court, if any of the public property is located within the limits of the new county, may apportion its value to the new county, and shall order the board of county commissioners of the new county to issue warrants in the amount of their proportionate share payable to the original county when the new county’s proportionate share of the indebtedness and interest is due. The proportion of indebtedness of the new county is a lien upon the taxable property of the new county.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 32, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 682; R.S. 1899, § 1017; C.S. 1910, § 1065; C.S. 1920, § 1298; R.S. 1931, § 26-605; C.S. 1945, § 26-220; W.S. 1957, § 18-46; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-1-320.
New county to issue warrants in payment; tax levy.

Upon receiving the order of the court pursuant to W.S.

18-1-319

the board of county commissioners of the new county shall issue and deliver warrants to the commissioners of the original county or counties.

Each year the board of county commissioners of the new county shall levy a sufficient tax upon all the taxable property in the county to pay its proportionate share of the indebtedness.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 32, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 683; R.S. 1899, § 1018; C.S. 1910, § 1066; C.S. 1920, § 1299; R.S. 1931, § 29-606; C.S. 1945, § 26-221; W.S. 1957, § 18-47; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.